Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8123.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30-8-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 30-8 entitled "Decorations"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
30-8-4. Rhode Island star.
The Rhode Island star may be awarded, in the name of the governor, to each person who,
while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the armed forces of the United
States, including the reserve components thereof, or of the Rhode Island national guard, while on
active state or federal service, distinguishes himself or herself conspicuously by exceptionally
meritorious service to the state or federal government in a duty of responsibility. The Rhode Island
star may also be awarded, in the name of the governor, to civilian government employees and
military and civilian senior leaders of foreign governments for their outstanding service and
contributions to the State of Rhode Island. No more than one Rhode Island star shall be awarded to
any one person, but for each succeeding service, sufficient to justify the award of a Rhode Island
star, a bronze oak leaf cluster shall be awarded in lieu thereof.
SECTION 2. Chapter 30-8 of the General Laws entitled "Decorations" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following sections:
30-8-11. The Rhode Island legion of merit.
(a) The Rhode Island legion of merit may be awarded, in the name of the adjutant general,
to each person who, while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the armed
forces of the United States, including the reserve components thereof, or of the Rhode Island

national guard, while serving in key leadership positions on active state or federal service,
distinguishes himself or herself conspicuously by exceptionally meritorious service in performance
of outstanding services and achievements to the state or federal government in a duty of
responsibility. The Rhode Island legion of merit may also be awarded, in the name of the adjutant
general, to retirees who served as a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the
armed forces of the United States, including the reserve components thereof, or of the Rhode Island
national guard, in key leadership positions on active state or federal service, and distinguished
himself or herself conspicuously by exceptionally meritorious service in performance of
outstanding services and achievements to the state or federal government in a duty of responsibility.
No more than one Rhode Island legion of merit shall be awarded to any one person, but for each
succeeding service, sufficient to justify the award of a Rhode Island legion of merit, a bronze oak
leaf cluster shall be awarded in lieu thereof.
(b) The adjutant general shall follow the provisions of §§ 30-8-7 and 30-8-8 with reference
to the design and procurement of the medal and the rules, regulations, and orders with reference
thereto.
30-8-12. Rhode Island state partnership program ribbon.
(a) The Rhode Island state partnership program ribbon may be awarded in the name of the
adjutant general, to each person who, while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted
person of the armed forces of the United States, including reserve components thereof, or of the
Rhode Island national guard, while on active, state, or federal service, serves for a period of five
(5) consecutive days in one of Rhode Island national guard’s state partnership program countries.
No more than one Rhode Island state partnership program ribbon shall be awarded to any one
person. This award may be retroactive at the discretion of the adjutant general.
(b) The adjutant general shall follow the provisions of §§ 30-8-7 and 30-8-8 with reference
to the design and procurement of the medal and the rules, regulations, and orders with reference
thereto.
30-8-13. Rhode Island funeral honors ribbon.
(a) The Rhode Island funeral honors ribbon may be awarded in the name of the adjutant
general, to each person who, while a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of
the armed forces of the United States, including reserve components thereof, or of the Rhode Island
national guard, while on active, state, or federal service, serves as a member of the funeral honors
team. No more than one Rhode Island funeral honors ribbon shall be awarded to any one person.
This award may be retroactive at the discretion of the adjutant general.
(b) The adjutant general shall follow the provisions of §§ 30-8-7 and 30-8-8 with reference
LC005434 - Page 2 of 4

to the design and procurement of the medal and the rules, regulations, and orders with reference
thereto.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005434
========
LC005434 - Page 3 of 4